Utah statutes.
13-40-202.   Removal of domain name or content -- Liability.
If an Internet registrar or Internet service provider believes in good faith
that an Internet domain name controlled or operated by the Internet registrar
or Internet service provider, or content residing on an Internet website or
other online location controlled or operated by the Internet registrar or
Internet service provider, is used to engage in a violation of this part, the
Internet registrar or Internet service provider is not liable under any
provision of the laws of this state or of any political subdivision of the
state for removing or disabling access to the Internet domain name or other
content.
